Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.530

Agreements for use of services or facilities between district boards of trustees and school boards.

The district boards of trustees and the common school boards are hereby authorized to enter into agreements for the use by either of the other's services, facilities or equipment and for the presentation of courses of either for students of the other where such agreements are deemed to be in the best interests of the education of the students involved.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.530. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 53. Formerly RCW 28.85.530.]

NOTES:

Community education programs: RCW 28A.620.020.